Louisiana, session 2026, HB465.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9038.82 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9038.82. Violet Economic Development District
A. There is hereby created within the parish of St. Bernard, as more
specifically provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and corporate
which shall be known as the Violet Economic Development District, referred to in
this Section as the "district". The district shall be a political subdivision of the state
as defined in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. The boundaries of the district shall encompass the following area:
Beginning at a point located in the centerline of the Mississippi River, the
boundary proceeds in a northeasterly direction, following Camille TLPK, to its
intersection with East St. Bernard Highway.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-357 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 465
From that point, the boundary turns northwesterly along East St. Bernard
Highway, then turns northeasterly onto Livaccari Dr.
The boundary continues northwesterly onto Birch Street, then turns
northeasterly onto Valmar Drive, and then proceeds northwesterly along East Judge
Perez Drive.
From East Judge Perez Drive, the boundary turns northeasterly onto Legend
Drive, then turns southeasterly onto Fable Drive, which curves and continues in a
generally northeasterly direction until it becomes Story Park Boulevard; the
boundary follows Story Park Boulevard to its intersection with the 40 Arpent Canal,
then turns southeasterly, following the 40 Arpent Canal.
Continuing along the 40 Arpent Canal, the boundary crosses East Judge Perez
Drive and proceeds southerly along Torres Drive.
The boundary then turns westerly onto Farmsite Rd, then turns southerly onto
Woodchase Court, which curves in a U-shaped alignment and continues northerly
to rejoin Farmsite Road.
From this point, the boundary proceeds westerly along Farmsite Rd, then
turns southerly onto East St. Bernard Highway.
The boundary then turns westerly onto Massicot Road, followed by a turn
southerly onto Saro Ln, which continues southerly and then curves to proceed
easterly.
From Saro Ln, the boundary turns southerly onto St. Bernard Parkway,
which proceeds in a generally southwesterly direction.
The boundary continues along St. Bernard Parkway until turning
northwesterly onto Jeanfreau Drive, then proceeds in a straight line extending from
Jeanfreau Drive to the centerline of the Mississippi River.
From this point, the boundary follows the centerline of the Mississippi River,
proceeding generally northeasterly, then curving and continuing northwesterly, along
the river's meander, until returning to the point of beginning.
C. The district is created to:
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-357 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 465
(1) Support long-term, place-based investments in infrastructure, housing,
workforce development, and community priorities within Violet.
(2) Align state, parish, and community interests related to Louisiana
International Terminal impacts and opportunities.
(3) Provide transparency and accountability in how incremental revenues are
reinvested locally.
D.(1) The district shall be governed by a nine-member board of
commissioners, referred to in this Section as the "board", composed as follows:
(a) The governor or his designee.
(b) The member of the Louisiana Senate who represents District No. 1 or his
designee.
(c) The member of the Louisiana Senate who represents District No. 3 or his
designee.
(d) The member of the Louisiana House of Representatives who represents
District No. 103 or his designee.
(e) The president of the governing authority of the parish of St. Bernard or
his designee.
(f) The Violet Action Committee shall appoint three members.
(g) Greater New Orleans Inc. shall appoint one member who is a
representative of Greater New Orleans, Inc. or his designee. The designee shall be
a resident of the district.
(2)(a) Members appointed pursuant to Subparagraphs (1)(f) and (g) of this
Subsection shall serve four-year terms after serving initial terms as provided in this
Subparagraph. One member shall serve an initial term of one year; one shall serve
two years; one shall serve three years; and one shall serve four years, as determined
by lot at the first meeting of the board.
(b) Members serving pursuant to Subparagraphs (1)(a) through (e) of this
Subsection shall serve during their terms of office. Designated members shall serve
at the pleasure of the designating authority.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-357 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 465
(3)(a) Any vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled in the
manner of the original appointment. If an appointing authority, other than the Violet
Action Committee, fails to fill a vacancy within sixty days, the Violet Action
Committee may appoint a successor to serve for the remainder of the term.
(b) If the Violet Action Committee fails to fill a vacancy within sixty days,
the remaining members of the board may appoint a successor to serve for the
remainder of the term.
(4) The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice president, a
secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as it may deem necessary. The duties
of the officers shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by the board.
(5) The minute books and archives of the district shall be maintained by the
secretary of the board. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the
official custody of the board.
(6) The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary
or advisable for conducting its business affairs. It shall hold regular meetings as shall
be provided for in the bylaws and may hold special meetings at such times and
places within the district as may be prescribed in the bylaws.
(7) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make
them available through the secretary of the board to residents of the district.
(8) The members of the board shall serve without compensation; however,
they may be reimbursed for expenses incurred while attending to the business of the
board or the district.
E. The district, acting by and through its board, shall have and exercise all
powers of a political subdivision necessary or convenient for carrying out its objects
and purposes, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To sue and to be sued.
(2) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(3) To adopt bylaws and rules and regulations.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-357 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 465
(4) To receive by gift, grant, or donation any sum of money, property, aid,
or assistance from the United States, the state of Louisiana, or any political
subdivision thereof, or any person, firm, or corporation.
(5) To enter into contracts, agreements, or cooperative endeavors with the
state and its political subdivisions or political corporations and with any public or
private association, corporation, business entity, or individual.
(6) To appoint officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties; and
fix their compensation.
(7) To acquire by purchase, gift, grant, donation, or lease property as may
be necessary or desirable for carrying out the objectives and purposes of the board.
(8) To perform any other necessary and ancillary acts to effectuate its
functions, to perform its duties, or to give effect to its powers in accordance with this
Section.
F. In order to fund development within the district, the district shall have
state sales tax increment finance authority that is provided to local governmental
subdivisions pursuant to R.S. 33:9038.34. The district shall capture no more than
twenty-five percent of incremental state sales tax growth generated within the
district. The annual pledged state increment would be capped at two million one
hundred thousand dollars. The cap may be adjusted for inflation. The district shall
not implement ad valorem or local sales tax increment finance authority. The district
shall have no other taxing authority.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-357 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 465